Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 29.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Quality assurance date. new text end new text begin "Quality assurance date" means any date after which the manufacturer or processor reasonably determines that the product may, by spoilage, wiltage, drying, or any other foreseeable and natural phenomenon, lose palatability or desired or nutritive properties. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 29.26, is amended to read: 29.26 EGGS IN POSSESSION OF RETAILER. new text begin (a) new text end All eggs sold or offered for sale at retail must have been candled and graded and must be clearly labeled according to Minnesota consumer grades as established by rule under section 29.23. No eggs shall be sold or offered for sale as "ungraded," "unclassified," or by any other name that does not clearly designate the grade. All eggs in possession of the retailer, either in temporary storage or on display, must be held at a temperature not to exceed 45 degrees Fahrenheit (7 degrees Celsius). new text begin (b) new text end Grade AA eggs held 31 days past the coded pack date for Grade AA eggs, or Grade A eggs held 46 days past the coded pack date for Grade A eggs, lose their grades and must be removed from saledeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin , except eggs that are past their quality assurance date may be donated to and distributed by charitable food assistance programs if the eggs:new text end new text begin (1) are contained in their original packaging; new text end new text begin (2) have previously been candled and graded; new text end new text begin (3) are continuously refrigerated; new text end new text begin (4) are distributed to the end consumer within 30 days of their original quality assurance date; and new text end new text begin (5) are contained in packaging affixed with a label that includes the following information: new text end new text begin (i) the name of the charitable food assistance program distributing the eggs; new text end new text begin (ii) a "distribute by" date of no more than 30 days past the original quality assurance date; and new text end new text begin (iii) the following statement: "Donated Eggs - Not for Resale." new text end